Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2229.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 104(17) and (18) of the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 104. Powers and duties of the department.1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 The department in consultation with the Department of Health regarding matters of public health significance shall have the power and its duty shall be to:* * *(17) administer funds collected by the United States Government and granted to Pennsylvania for the purpose of closing, maintaining or monitoring abandoned or closed hazardous waste storage, treatment or disposal sites and for the purpose of action to abate or prevent pollution at such sites. If Congress has not authorized the collection of such funds within one year after the effective date of this act, or if the department finds that the funding program authorized is inadequate, the department shall transmit to the General Assembly within 15 months after the effective date of this act a proposal for the establishment of a fund in Pennsylvania comprised of surcharges collected from users of hazardous waste storage, treatment and disposal facilities excluding captive facilities in the Commonwealth. Such fund shall be proposed for the purpose of closing, maintaining or monitoring hazardous waste storage, treatment or disposal sites excluding captive facilities which have been abandoned or which have been closed for at least 20 years, and for the purpose of taking action to abate or prevent pollution at such closed or abandoned sites; [and](18) encourage the beneficial use or processing of municipal waste or residual waste when the department determines that such use does not harm or present a threat of harm to the health, safety or welfare of the people or environment of this Commonwealth. The department shall establish waste regulations to effectuate the beneficial use 20260HB2229PN2922 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of municipal and residual waste, including regulations for the issuance of general permits for any category of beneficial use or processing of municipal waste or residual waste on a regional or Statewide basis in accordance with the regulations adopted by the Environmental Quality Board. The department may or may not require insurance under section 502(e) or bonds under section 505(a) for any general permit or class of general permits promulgated under this paragraph. Except with the written approval of the department, no waste may be stored for longer than one year. Residual wastes being stored shall be monitored for changes in physical and chemical properties, including leachability, pursuant to applicable regulations, by the person or municipality beneficially using or processing such waste. The department may require the submission of periodic analyses or other information to insure that the quality of residual waste to be beneficially used or processed does not change. A municipality or person beneficially using or processing the residual waste shall immediately notify the department, upon forms provided by department, of any change in the physical or chemical properties of the residual waste, including leachability; and the department shall conduct an investigation and order necessary corrective action. Upon receipt of a signed, written complaint of any person whose health, safety or welfare may be adversely affected by a physical or chemical change in the properties of residual waste to be beneficially used or processed, including leachability, the department shall determine the validity of the complaint and take appropriate action[.];(19) if the department receives a notice of 20260HB2229PN2922 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 noncompliance issued by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for a violation of 15 U.S.C. Ch. 53 (relating to toxic substances control), forward the notice to the municipality where the violation occurred within 14 calendar days of receipt; and(20) provide a copy of all notices of violation issued under the authority of this act to the municipality where the recipient facility or site is located. A municipality may request at any time not to receive copies of notices of violation or noncompliance referenced in this paragraph and paragraph (19). The request must be in writing from an authorized municipal representative to the regional waste program manager in the appropriate regional office of the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2229PN2922 - 4 - 123456789101112131415